West Virginia, session 2025, HB2782.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 36. display of national motto. §18-36-1. Display of the National Motto in schools and state institutions of higher education. (a) A public elementary, secondary school, or a state institution of higher education must display in a conspicuous place in each building of the school or institution a durable poster or framed copy of the United States national motto, "In God We Trust", if the poster or framed copy meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section and is:(1) Donated for display at the school or institution; or(2) Purchased from private donations and made available to the school or institution.(b) A poster or framed copy of the national motto described in subsection (a) of this section:(1) Must contain a representation of the United States flag centered under the national motto and a representation of the state flag; and(2) May not depict any words, images, or other information other than the representations listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection.(c) A public elementary or secondary school and an institution of higher education may accept and use private donations for the purposes of subsection (a) of this section.